California, session 20252026, AB2512.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 54324.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:54324.5. (a) If an exemption to this article is granted to the City of Anaheim for the disposition of surplus land involving the sale or lease of Angel Stadium to the Major League Baseball team known as the Los Angeles Angels, then any materials, including, but not limited to, a lease, deed of sale, and promotional or marketing materials, shall refer to that team as the Anaheim Angels.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the requirement in subdivision (a) would not apply if the City of Anaheim is able to come to an agreement with the Major League Baseball team known as the Los Angeles Angels about their affiliation.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the corruption scandal related to the almost sale of Angel Stadium in 2020, and the current lease agreement with the City of Anaheim.SECTION 1.Section 56000 of the Government Code is amended to read:56000.This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________